West Virginia, session 2026, HB4203.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. Authorization for Department of Administration to promulgate legislative rules. §64-2-1. Board of Risk and Insurance Management. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 8, 2025, authorized under the authority of §29-12-14 of this code, modified by the Board of Risk and Insurance Management to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 10, 2025, relating to the Board of Risk and Insurance Management (public entities insurance program, 115 CSR 02), is authorized.